Alaska, session 34, HB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 28.10 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 28.10.068. Registration of legally imported vehicles. If a vehicle is at 06 least 25 years old and was legally imported into the United States, the department may 07 not require that the vehicle comply with current federal motor vehicle safety standards 08 before registering the vehicle under this chapter. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 28.10.221 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (e) If a vehicle is registered under AS 28.10.068, the department may not 11 refuse, suspend, or revoke a certificate of title based on the vehicle's failure to comply 12 with current federal motor vehicle safety standards. 13 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.